Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.531

Unlawful installation/maintenance—Disputed interpretation—Board to determine methods.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity to install or maintain telecommunications equipment not in accordance with this subchapter. In cases where the interpretation and application of the installation or maintenance standards under this subchapter are in dispute or in doubt, the board shall, upon application of any interested person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity, determine the methods of installation or maintenance or the materials, devices, appliances, or equipment to be used in the particular case submitted for its decision.

[ 2000 c 238 s 217.]

NOTES:

Severability—2000 c 238: See note following RCW 19.28.301.